Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB53.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 617(A)(3) and (9) and 617.1 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended to read:Section 617. Conditions Subject to Which Policies Are to Be Issued.--(A) No such policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this Commonwealth unless:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (3) it purports to insure only one person, except that a policy may insure, originally or by subsequent amendment, upon the application of an adult head of a family who shall be deemed the policyholder, any two or more eligible members of that family, including husband, wife, dependent children or any children under a specified age which[, except as provided under section 617.1, shall not exceed nineteen] shall be at least twenty-six years, and any other person dependent upon the policyholder; and* * *(9) A policy delivered or issued for delivery after January 1, 1968, under which coverage of a dependent of a policyholder terminates at a specified age shall, with respect to an unmarried child covered by the policy prior to the attainment of the age of [nineteen] twenty-six who is incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of [mental retardation or physical handicap] an intellectual or physical disability and who became so incapable prior to attainment of age [nineteen] twenty-six and who is chiefly dependent upon such policyholder for support and maintenance, not so terminate while the policy remains in force and the dependent remains in such condition, if the policyholder has within thirty-one days of such dependent's attainment of the limiting age submitted proof of such dependent's incapacity as described herein. The foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall not require an insurer to insure a dependent who [is a mentally retarded or physically handicapped child] has an intellectual or physical disability where the policy is underwritten on evidence of insurability based on health factors set forth in the application or where such dependent does not satisfy the conditions of the policy as 20250SB0053PN0137 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to any requirement for evidence of insurability or other provisions of the policy, satisfaction of which is required for coverage thereunder to take effect. In any such case the terms of the policy shall apply with regard to the coverage or exclusion from coverage of such dependent.* * *Section 617.1. Health Insurance Coverage for Certain Children of Insured Parents.--(A) (1) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth that provides dependent coverage of children shall continue to make such coverage available for an adult child who has not attained the age of twenty-six prior to the date of issuance or renewal.(2) With respect to a child who has not attained the age of twenty-six, a health insurance policy:(i) May define dependent for purposes of eligibility for dependent coverage of children in terms of a relationship between the child and the policyholder or certificate holder, including as described in 26 U.S.C. § 152(f)(1) (relating to dependent defined).(ii) May not deny or restrict dependent coverage based on any of the following or any combination of the following:(a) The presence or absence of the child's financial dependency on any other person.(b) The residency of the child, whether by location, including service area, or by residency with any other person.(c) The marital status of the child.(d) The child's enrollment in an academic or vocational educational institution.(e) The child's employment status.(3) A health insurance policy providing dependent coverage 20250SB0053PN0137 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of children may deny or limit coverage, or impose additional conditions for coverage, for individuals not described in 26 U.S.C. § 152(f)(1).(4) The terms of a health insurance policy providing dependent coverage of children pursuant to this subsection may not vary based on age . (B) (1) An insurer that issues, delivers, executes or renews a group health [care] insurance policy in this Commonwealth under which coverage of a child would otherwise terminate at a specified age shall, at the option of the policyholder, provide coverage to a child of an insured employe beyond that specified age, up through and including the age of 29, at the insured employe's expense, and provided that the child meet all of the following requirements:[(1)] (i) Is not married.[(2)] (ii) Has no dependents.[(3)] (iii) Is a resident of this Commonwealth or is enrolled as a full-time student at an institution of higher education.[(4)] (iv) Is not provided coverage as a named subscriber, insured, enrollee or covered person under any other group or individual health insurance policy or enrolled in or entitled to benefits under any government health care benefits program, including benefits under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.).[(B)] (2) Insurers may determine increases in premiums related to continuation of coverage for the adult dependent [past the limiting age of nineteen] twenty-six years of age or older.(C) This section shall not include the following types of 20250SB0053PN0137 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance or any combination thereof:(1) Hospital indemnity.(2) Accident.(3) Specified disease.(4) Disability income.(5) Dental.(6) Vision.(7) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(8) Medicare supplement.(9) Long-term care.(10) Other limited benefit plans.(11) [Individual health insurance policies.] Fixed indemnity.(12) Credit.(13) Workers' compensation or automobile medical payment insurance.(D) For the purpose of this section:"Health [care] insurance policy" means a [group] health, sickness or accident policy or subscriber contract or certificate issued by an entity subject to any one of the following:(1) This act, including section 630.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the "Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act."(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services 20250SB0053PN0137 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plan corporations).(5) Article XXIV.Section 2. The amendment of sections 617(A)(3) and (9) and 617.1 of the act shall apply to health insurance policies offered, issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0053PN0137 - 6 - 123456789